Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-494] Reconsideration of the need for
an educational representative. (a) If the adult student, educational
representative, or qualified professional believes the adult student has
regained decisional capacity, the adult student shall be assessed for capacity
by a qualified professional who shall determine whether or not the adult
student has regained decisional capacity and shall document the decision and
the basis for the decision and provide the findings of the reconsideration in
writing to be entered into the adult student's educational record. The
qualified professional shall notify the adult student and the educational
representative of any changes in the adult student's educational program.

(b) A special education decision made by an
educational representative for an adult student shall be effective without
judicial approval. [L 2008, c 182, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next